Illinois, session 104th, SB3626.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 510-31 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-31 new)7    Sec. 10-31. Military recruiters; career-related events and 8advertisements. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Career-related event" means any event that occurs on 11school district or public school grounds or is sponsored 12either wholly or partially by a public school or school 13district and that is wholly or partially providing businesses 14or higher educational institutions an opportunity to inform 15students about or offer students post-secondary opportunities.16    "Military recruiter" means an armed forces recruiter for 17any branch of the United States military.18    (b) At least 5 days prior to a career-related event being 19held, a school district must notify the nearest military 20recruiter about the career-related event. This notification 21requirement is satisfied if, at the beginning of the school 22year, the school district sends a calendar of career-related 23events being held during the school year to the military   SB3626- 2 -LRB104 18541 LNS 31984 b1recruiter; however, if a career-related event is set to occur 2and is not on the calendar or if any rescheduling of a 3career-related event occurs before the career-related event 4takes place, the school district shall notify the military 5recruiter as required in this Section.6    The notification shall include the time and date of the 7career-related event and the address of the facility where the 8career-related event will be held. The notification shall be 9sent either through electronic means or in writing.10    (c) If a military recruiter provides at least 2 days' 11notice to a school district that the military recruiter 12intends to attend a career-related event, the school district 13or school shall provide accommodations to the military 14recruiter that include a prominent location at the 15career-related event either in the facility or on the grounds 16where the career-related event is being held.17    (d) If a military recruiter sends an advertisement for 18military careers and opportunities to a school district for 19display, the school district shall require each school to 20display the advertisement in the school counselor's office or 21in the main office of the school. 22    (e) If a school or school district does not comply with any 23of the requirements under this Section, a military recruiter 24may send notice to the regional office of education with 25jurisdiction over the school district that the school or 26school district is not complying with the requirements of this   SB3626- 3 -LRB104 18541 LNS 31984 b1Section. After receiving notification from the military 2recruiter, the regional office of education shall file a 3notice to remedy with the noncomplying school or school 4district.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62026.